Arkansas, session 2025, SB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-4-121(a)(2)(A), concerning the duties of
the State Board of Election Commissioners during a post-election audit, is
amended to read as follows:
(A)(i) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision
(a)(2)(A)(ii) of this section, Select select by lot the counties, polling
sites, early voting locations, and vote centers to be audited.
(ii) If a county in the immediately preceding
preferential primary election or general election is found to have less than
one hundred percent (100%) accuracy in the State Board of Election
Commissioners audit, the county shall be chosen for audit in the subsequent
preferential primary election or general election;


*SSS118*
02/25/2025 8:59:36 AM SSS118